North Dakota statutes. TITLE 36 Livestock
CHAPTER 36-05 Livestock Auction Markets [Repealed]

Source:

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-05-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 9, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 36-0501; S.L. 1957, ch. 231, § 19; 1957 Supp., § 36-0501; S.L. 1959, ch. 276, § 1; 1985, ch. 392, § 1; 1999, ch. 317, § 11; 1999, ch. 321, § 6; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-05-02.
Premises excluded from application of chapter. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 9, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 36-0502; S.L. 1963, ch. 257, § 1; 1997, ch. 309, § 6; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-05-03.
License requirements — Application — Fee — Commission schedule — Facilities. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 9, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 36-0503; S.L. 1951, ch. 222, § 1; 1953, ch. 218, § 1; 1957, ch. 231, § 20; 1957, ch. 233, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 36-0503; S.L. 1959, ch. 276, §§ 2, 13; 1961, ch. 241, § 1; 1965, ch. 244, § 1; 1985, ch. 392, § 2; 1989, ch. 80, § 32; 1989, ch. 427, § 2; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1995, ch. 347, § 22; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-05-04.
Bond to accompany application for license — Amount — Approval — Conditions — Exemptions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 9, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 36-0504; S.L. 1951, ch. 222, § 2; 1957, ch. 231, § 21; 1957 Supp., § 36-0504; S.L. 1959, ch. 276, § 3; 1961, ch. 241, § 2; 1965, ch. 245, §§ 1, 2; 1985, ch. 392, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-05-04.1.
Records release required with application for licensure. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 3; 1997, ch. 309, § 7; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-05-05.
Expiration and renewal of license — Fee returned upon failure to issue or renew license. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 9, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 36-0505; S.L. 1953, ch. 218, § 2; 1957, ch. 231, § 22; 1957 Supp., § 36-0505; S.L. 1959, ch. 276, § 4; 1961, ch. 241, § 3; 1985, ch. 392, § 4; 1991, ch. 374, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-05-06.
Investigation of auction market — Hearing to determine whether license should be issued or revoked. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 9, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 36-0506; S.L. 1957, ch. 231, § 23; 1957 Supp., § 36-0506; S.L. 1959, ch. 276, § 5; 1961, ch. 241, § 4; 1985, ch. 389, § 5; 1985, ch. 392, § 5; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-05-06.1.
Cease and desist authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 389, § 9; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-05-06.2.
Injunctive authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 389, § 11; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-05-07.
Sanitary regulations of livestock auction market. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 9, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 36-0507; S.L. 1959, ch. 276, § 6; 1989, ch. 80, § 33; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-05-08.
Scales maintained by auction market to be inspected. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 9, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 36-0508; S.L. 1959, ch. 276, § 7; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-05-09.
Records to be kept by operator of auction market — Contents — Examination — Report. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 9, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 36-0509; S.L. 1951, ch. 222, § 3; 1957, ch. 231, § 24; 1957 Supp., § 36-0509; S.L. 1959, ch. 276, § 8; 1961, ch. 241, § 5; 1985, ch. 392, § 6; 1989, ch. 80, § 34; 1995, ch. 347, § 23; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-05-09.1.
Notice — Nonsufficient funds checks. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 426, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-05-10.
Inspection of livestock — Fees and rules governing. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 9, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 36-0510; S.L. 1949, ch. 228, § 1; 1957, ch. 234, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 36-0510; S.L. 1959, ch. 276, § 9; 1963, ch. 201, § 7; 1969, ch. 321, § 1; 1979, ch. 187, § 69; 1989, ch. 80, § 35; 1995, ch. 347, § 24; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-05-10.1.
Livestock unfit for sale. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 317, § 12; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-05-11.
Treatment administered to livestock before removal from auction market — Fees for inspection and treatment. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 9, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 36-0511; S.L. 1959, ch. 276, § 10; 1987, ch. 417, § 2; 1989, ch. 80, § 36; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-05-11.1.
Grievance committee. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 417, § 1; 1989, ch. 80, § 37; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-05-12.
Operator to warrant title to purchaser — Dispute in title of animal sold. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 9, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 36-0512; S.L. 1957, ch. 231, § 25; 1957 Supp., § 36-0512; S.L. 1959, ch. 276, § 11; 1959, ch. 277, § 1; 1999, ch. 318, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-05-13.
Use of fees — Grounds for refusal or revocation of license — Procedure on default of licensee. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 9, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 36-0513; S.L. 1957, ch. 231, § 26; 1957 Supp., § 36-0513; S.L. 1959, ch. 276, § 12; 1961, ch. 241, § 6; 1985, ch. 389, § 7; 1985, ch. 392, § 7; 1989, ch. 80, § 38; 1995, ch. 347, § 25; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-05-13.1.
Review by the court. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1961, ch. 241, § 7; 1985, ch. 392, § 8; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-05-13.2.
Unlawful acts. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 309, § 8; 1999, ch. 317, § 13; 2009, ch. 80, § 16; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-05-14.
Penalties — Criminal — Civil. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1933, ch. 7, § 10; 1935, ch. 2, § 8; 1937, ch. 5, § 6; R.C. 1943, § 36-0514; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 374; 1997, ch. 309, § 9; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-05-15.
Public livestock markets or commission firms — Duplicate scale tickets. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 273, § 1; 1975, ch. 106, § 375; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.